Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 2. Specific Coverage Provisions.
Sec. 21.42.430.
Coverage for anti-cancer medication.

Except for a fraternal benefit society, a health care insurer that offers, issues for delivery, delivers, or renews in this state a health care insurance plan that provides coverage for anti- cancer medications that are injected or intravenously administered by a health care provider and patient-administered anti-cancer medications, including those orally administered or self-injected, may not require a higher copayment, deductible, or coinsurance amount for a patient-administered medication than it requires for an anti- cancer medication injected or intravenously administered by a health care provider, regardless of the formulation or benefit category determination by the policy or plan.

A health care insurer may not offset the costs of compliance with (a) of this section by

increasing the copayment, deductible, or coinsurance amount required for anti-cancer medications injected or intravenously administered by a health care provider that are covered under the health insurance plan; or

reclassifying benefits with respect to anti-cancer medications.

Nothing in this section prohibits a health care insurance plan from requiring different cost-sharing rates for in-network and out-of-network providers or pharmacies.

In this section, “anti-cancer medication” means a drug or biologic used to kill cancerous cells, to slow or prevent the growth of cancerous cells, or to treat related side effects.

History.

(§ 1 ch 34 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Section 3, ch. 34, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 2, ch. 34, SLA 2016, this section "applies to a health insurance policy that is offered, issued for delivery, delivered, or renewed on or after January 1, 2017."

Sec. 21.42.500.
[Renumbered as AS 21.42.599.]

Sec. 21.42.599.
Definitions.

In AS

21.42.345

—

21.42.599

,

“copayment” means the portion of medical care expenses in excess of the deductible to be paid by a covered individual;

“deductible” means the portion of medical care expenses for which a covered individual must pay before benefits become payable;

“excepted benefits” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.160

;

“fraternal benefit society” has the meaning given in AS

21.84.900

;

“health care insurance plan” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

; “health care insurance plan” does not include short-term limited-duration insurance offered to individuals in the individual market;

“health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“individual market” has the meaning given in AS

21.51.500

;

“placed for adoption” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

.

History.

(§ 56 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 5 ch 22 SLA 2001; am §§ 40, 41 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.42.500

.
Renumbered in 2010, at which time “AS

21.42.345

—

21.42.599

” was substituted for “AS

21.42.345

—

21.42.500

.” The paragraphs in this section were renumbered in 2002 to maintain alphabetical order.